Nevada, session 83, SB216.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to United Citizens Foundation, Inc. for the provision
of mental health and substance use disorder services and community
resource assistance to pupils and their parents, guardians and
families and personnel within the K-12 public education system the
following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $3,000,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $3,000,000
2. Upon acceptance of the money appropriated by subsection 1,
United Citizens Foundation, Inc. agrees to:
(a) Prepare and transmit a report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before December 18, 2026, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection 1
from the date on which the money was received by the United
Citizens Foundation, Inc. through December 1, 2026;
-
*SB216*

– 2 –
(b) Prepare and transmit a final report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before September 17, 2027, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection 1
from the date on which the money was received by United Citizens
Foundation, Inc. through June 30, 2027; and
(c) Upon request of the Legislative Commission, make
available to the Legislative Auditor any of the books, accounts,
claims, reports, vouchers or other records of information,
confidential or otherwise, of the United Citizens Foundation, Inc.,
regardless of their form or location, that the Legislative Auditor
deems necessary to conduct an audit of the use of the money
appropriated by subsection 1.
3. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB216*